South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4925.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120(79) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (H) For purposes of this item, "taxpayer" includes a person who bears a relationship to the taxpayer as described in Section 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----